Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Mississippi Marketing Council

§ 57-11-1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-41; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 1; 1979, ch. 438, § 18]

§ 57-11-3.
Duties and responsibilities of council.

The duties and responsibilities of the council shall be to advise the division of marketing of the Mississippi Department of Economic Development regarding the development and execution of programs designed to carry out the purposes hereinbefore stated and to advise the governor and the legislature regarding policies and laws bearing upon the marketing of products and services and the establishment of industries utilizing or otherwise relating to agricultural and forestry products.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-42; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 19, eff from and after February 1, 1980.

§ 57-11-5.
Composition of council; terms of members; officers; quorum.

The council shall consist of fifteen (15) members from the state at large, representative of the various segments of agriculture and forestry, to be selected and appointed by the governor, and who shall serve for a term of not more than four (4) years under each appointment, which term of office shall expire at the expiration of the term of office for which the governor appointing the members was elected, without regard for the date of actual appointment of the members. Such members shall continue to serve until their successors have been appointed and duly qualified. The governor shall appoint a chairman and a vice-chairman of the council, and nine (9) members shall constitute a quorum of the members thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8940-43; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 4, 1964).

§ 57-11-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-44; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 4; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 20]

§ 57-11-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 22, eff from and after February 1, 1980.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-45; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 5]

§ 57-11-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-46; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 21]

§ 57-11-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1979, ch. 438, § 22, eff from and after February 1, 1980.

[Codes, 1942, § 8940-47; Laws, 1964, ch. 512, § 7]

§ 57-11-15.
Establishment of Mississippi Craft Stores.

For the purpose of aiding, establishing and providing proper facilities for the efficient display and merchandising of crafts and arts in the interest of those individual citizens who are producing and are capable of producing various items of value and interest, the general public and the State of Mississippi, and to assist in the display, disposal and sale of such arts and crafts, there is hereby established under the supervision of the Mississippi Marketing Council the Mississippi Craft Stores.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 419, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1973).

§ 57-11-17.
Powers and authority of marketing council with respect to acquisition of facilities for craft stores.

The Mississippi Marketing Council is hereby authorized to acquire by donation or lease for and in the name of the State of Mississippi suitable and accessible facilities as may be necessary for the display, disposal and sale of those certain objects of crafts and arts set forth in Section 57-11-15. The marketing council is hereby authorized and empowered to lease, or rent, to any individual any part of the property under its jurisdiction acquired for such purposes. The funds derived from any lease, or rental contract, entered into under authority of this section shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the general fund of the state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 419, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1973).

§ 57-11-19.
Cooperation with marketing council by state agencies.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, the Mississippi Arts Commission, the Mississippi Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, the Mississippi Extension Service, the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce, the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development, and the Mississippi Fair Commission may cooperate with the marketing council in carrying out the purposes of Sections 57-11-15 through 57-11-21.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 419, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 53; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 126, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 57-11-21.
Restrictions on sales of merchandise by craft stores.

No craft store shall have on display, for sale, or otherwise handle any merchandise commercially manufactured except soft drinks or other items related to snacks.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 419, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1973).